build/ru_RU.dic
блестеть/BGLLNP
брюзжать/BGLLNP
вдвинуть/BGLLNN
веять/BGLLNn
взметаться/BBBGLLNNNn
вкинуть/BGLLNN
воздержаться/BGLLNP
воркотать/BGLLNn
вписать/BGLLNP
всклепать/BGLLNn
встопорщиться/BbBGLLNNYY
втесаться/BGLLNP
выверить/BGSNSmSrSu
выглодать/BBBGLLNNNP
выжарить/BGLLNN
выкинуть/BGLLNN
выкрасить/BbBGLLNn
выметать/BBBGLLNNNn
вынизать/BGLLNn
выписаться/BGLLNP
выплясаться/BGLLNP
выпучиться/BGLLNN
высеять/BGLLNn
высмотреть/BGLLNn
выставиться/BbBGLLNn
высыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
выткаться/BGLLNn
вычесаться/BGLLNP
вянуть/BGLlLMNN
гнести/BGLMNPYySXsMsYTF
гудеть/BGLLNn
довертеть/BGLLNn
догореть/BGLLNn
докипеть/BGLLNn
домолоть/BGLLNP
дописать/BGLLNP
дорвать/BGLLNn
досмеяться/BGLLNn
достояться/BGLLNn
доткать/BGLLNn
дрейфить/BbBGLLNn
дьяконить/BbBGLLNN
забеспокоить/BGLLNN
забояться/BGLLNn
забыться/BGLLNp
завраться/BGLLNn
загореться/BGLLNn
задержать/BGLLNP
заждаться/BGLLNP
закапать/BBBGLLNNNn
заклеить/BGLLNN
закряхтеть/BGLLNn
зализать/BGLLNn
замолоть/BGLLNP
занять/BGLLNn
заплескать/BBBGLLNNNn
запрятать/BGLLNn
зарокотать/BGLLNn
засеять/BGLLNn
засмеять/BGLLNn
засрать/BGLLNn
застроиться/BGLLNN
затесать/BGLLNP
затоптать/BGLLNn
захлопотать/BGLLNn
зачесаться/BGLLNP
зашуметь/BGLLNn
зудеть/BGLLNn
извертеться/BGLLNn
излизать/BGLLNn
изолгаться/BGLLNn
изыскаться/BGLLNn
исстонаться/BGLLNn
исхаять/BGLLNn
каяться/BGLLNn
клекотать/BGLLNn
корпеть/BGLLNn
лаяться/BGLLNn
лизать/BGLLNn
маяться/BGLLNn
мурчать/BGLLNP
набрехать/BGLLNn
наврать/BGLLNn
нагрянуть/BGLLNN
надорвать/BGLLNn
наждаться/BGLLNP
наклеить/BGLLNN
налгать/BGLLNn
намолоть/BGLLNP
напахаться/BGLLNn
наполоскаться/BBBGLLNNNn
насвистеть/BGLLNP
насмердеть/BGLLNn
наспаться/BGLLNn
настыть/BGLLNn
наткать/BGLLNn
нахлынуть/BGLLNN
нащипать/BBBGLLNNNn
недосыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
обвязаться/BGLLNn
обеспокоиться/BGLLNN
облизаться/BGLLNn
обожраться/BGLLNn
обрестись/BGLMNPYy
обскакать/BGLLNn
обсыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
обтрепаться/BGLLNn
общипаться/BBBGLLNNNn
оглядеться/BGLLNn
опалубить/BbBGLLNn
опрокинуть/BGLLNN
осмотреть/BGLLNn
отблистать/BBBGLLNN
отвисеться/BGLLNn
отдраить/BGLLNN
откинуть/BGLLNN
отлаяться/BGLLNn
отмолоть/BGLLNP
отодвинуться/BGLLNN
отпахаться/BGLLNn
отполоскать/BBBGLLNNNn
отсеяться/BGLLNn
отстояться/BGLLNn
оттрепаться/BGLLNn
отщепать/BBBGLLNNNn
парусить/BbBGLLNp
перевисеть/BGLLNn
передвинуться/BGLLNN
перезанять/BGLLNn
перекричать/BGLLNP
перемолоться/BGLLNP
переплюнуть/BGLLNN
пересвистеть/BGLLNP
пересняться/BGLLNn
перестыть/BGLLNn
перетоптаться/BGLLNn
писать/BBBGLLNNNP
плющить/BbBGLLNN
поболеть/BBBGLLNNNn
побурчать/BGLLNP
поворчать/BGLLNP
повянуть/BGLMNN
погрохотать/BGLLNn
подглодать/BBBGLLNNNP
подзадержаться/BGLLNP
поднанять/BGLLNn
подорвать/BGLLNn
подремать/BGLLNn
подсмотреть/BGLLNn
подсунуть/BGLLNN
подудеть/BGLLNp
подышать/BGLLNP
позвучать/BGLLNP
покапать/BBBGLLNNNn
покоптеть/BGLLNn
полаять/BGLLNn
полопотать/BGLLNn
полусмеяться/BGLLNn
помолчать/BGLLNP
понадобиться/BbBGLLNn
пообождать/BGLLNP
поостыть/BGLLNn
пополоскаться/BBBGLLNNNn
порассеять/BGLLNn
порычать/BGLLNP
поскорбеть/BGLLNn
постаять/BGLLNn
посыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
поторчать/BGLLNP
похохотать/BGLLNn
пошелестеть/BGLLNP
пощипать/BBBGLLNNNn
предусмотреть/BGLLNn
приврать/BGLLNn
придвинуться/BGLLNN
прикинуться/BGLLNN
приметать/BBBGLLNNNn
принять/BGLLNn
приписаться/BGLLNP
прискакать/BGLLNn
пристынуть/BGLMNN
притрепать/BGLLNn
проблистать/BBBGLLNN
провертеть/BGLLNn
проврать/BGLLNn
прогреметь/BGLLNn
продребезжать/BGLLNP
прожраться/BGLLNn
прокинуть/BGLLNN
прокорпеть/BGLLNn
пролопотать/BGLLNn
промчать/BGLLNP
прописаться/BGLLNP
прореветь/BGLLNn
просеяться/BGLLNn
прососать/BGLLNn
прострекотать/BGLLNn
просыпаться/BBBGLLNNNn
протоптаться/BGLLNn
прохрустеть/BGLLNP
прянуть/BGLLNN
развеять/BGLLNn
разгореться/BGLLNn
раззудеться/BGLLNn
разлизать/BGLLNn
размолоться/BGLLNP
раскинуть/BGLLNN
расплющиться/BbBGLLNN
рассыпать/BBBGLLNNNn
расщебетаться/BGLLNn
сахариться/BGLLNN
сдвинуться/BGLLNN
скинуть/BGLLNN
смеяться/BGLLNn
содеяться/BGLLNn
спаться/BGLLNn
стаять/BGLLNn
стронуться/BGLLNN
таращить/BbBGLLNN
торчать/BGLLNP
увянуть/BGLMNN
улежать/BGLLNP
упокоиться/BGLLNN
успокоить/BGLLNN
учуять/BGLLNn
чуять/BGLLNn
щипаться/BBBGLLNNNn
